Virginia statutes. Title 32.1. Health.
Article 1.1. Medical Care Facilities Certificate of Public Need.
§ 32.1-102.2.
Regulations.

The Board shall promulgate regulations that are consistent with this article and:

Shall establish concise procedures for the prompt review of applications for certificates consistent with the provisions of this article which may include a structured batching process which incorporates, but is not limited to, authorization for the Commissioner to request proposals for certain projects. In any structured batching process established by the Board, applications, combined or separate, for computed tomographic (CT) scanning, magnetic resonance imaging (MRI), positron emission tomographic (PET) scanning, radiation therapy, stereotactic radiotherapy other than radiotherapy performed using a linear accelerator or other medical equipment that uses concentrated doses of high-energy X-rays to perform external beam radiation therapy, and proton beam therapy shall be considered in the radiation therapy batch. A single application may be filed for a combination of (i) radiation therapy, stereotactic radiotherapy other than radiotherapy performed using a linear accelerator or other medical equipment that uses concentrated doses of high-energy X-rays to perform external beam radiation therapy, and proton beam therapy and (ii) any or all of the computed tomographic (CT) scanning, magnetic resonance imaging (MRI), and positron emission tomographic (PET) scanning;

May classify projects and may eliminate one or more or all of the procedures prescribed in §

32.1-102.6

for different classifications;

May provide for exempting from the requirement of a certificate projects determined by the Commissioner, upon application for exemption, to be subject to the economic forces of a competitive market or to have no discernible impact on the cost or quality of health services;

May establish a schedule of fees for applications for certificates or registration of a project to be applied to expenses for the administration and operation of the Certificate of Public Need Program;

Shall establish an expedited application and review process for any certificate for projects reviewable pursuant to subdivision B 8 of §

32.1-102.1

:3. Regulations establishing the expedited application and review procedure shall include provisions for notice and opportunity for public comment on the application for a certificate, and criteria pursuant to which an application that would normally undergo the review process would instead undergo the full certificate of public need review process set forth in §

32.1-102.6

;

Shall establish an exemption from the requirement for a certificate for a project involving a temporary increase in the total number of beds in an existing hospital or nursing home, including a temporary increase in the total number of beds resulting from the addition of beds at a temporary structure or satellite location operated by the hospital or nursing home, provided that the ability remains to safely staff services across the existing hospital or nursing home, (i) for a period of no more than the duration of the Commissioner’s determination plus 30 days when the Commissioner has determined that a natural or man-made disaster has caused the evacuation of a hospital or nursing home and that a public health emergency exists due to a shortage of hospital or nursing home beds or (ii) for a period of no more than the duration of the emergency order entered pursuant to §

32.1-13

or

32.1-20

plus 30 days when the Board, pursuant to §

32.1-13

, or the Commissioner, pursuant to §

32.1-20

, has entered an emergency order for the purpose of suppressing a nuisance dangerous to public health or a communicable, contagious, or infectious disease or other danger to the public life and health; and

Shall require every medical care facility subject to the requirements of this article, other than a nursing home, that is not a medical care facility for which a certificate with conditions imposed pursuant to subsection B of §

32.1-102.4

has been issued and that provides charity care, as defined in §

32.1-102.1

, to annually report the amount of charity care provided.

The Board shall promulgate regulations providing for time limitations for schedules for completion and limitations on the exceeding of the maximum capital expenditure amount for all reviewable projects. The Commissioner shall not approve any such extension or excess unless it complies with the Board’s regulations. However, the Commissioner may approve a significant change in cost for an approved project that exceeds the authorized capital expenditure by more than 20 percent, provided the applicant has demonstrated that the cost increases are reasonable and necessary under all the circumstances and do not result from any material expansion of the project as approved.

The Board shall also promulgate regulations authorizing the Commissioner to condition approval of a certificate on the agreement of the applicant to provide a level of charity care to indigent persons or accept patients requiring specialized care. Such regulations shall include a methodology and formulas for uniform application of, active measuring and monitoring of compliance with, and approval of alternative plans for satisfaction of such conditions. In addition, the Board’s licensure regulations shall direct the Commissioner to condition the issuing or renewing of any license for any applicant whose certificate was approved upon such condition on whether such applicant has complied with any agreement to provide a level of charity care to indigent persons or accept patients requiring specialized care. Except in the case of nursing homes, the value of charity care provided to individuals pursuant to this subsection shall be based on the provider reimbursement methodology utilized by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services for reimbursement under Title XVIII of the Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. § 1395 et seq.

The Board shall also promulgate regulations to require the registration of a project; for introduction into an existing medical care facility of any new lithotripsy, stereotactic radiosurgery, stereotactic radiotherapy performed using a linear accelerator or other medical equipment that uses concentrated doses of high-energy X-rays to perform external beam radiation therapy, obstetrical, or nuclear imaging services that the facility has never provided or has not provided in the previous 12 months; and for the addition by an existing medical care facility of any medical equipment for lithotripsy, stereotactic radiosurgery, stereotactic radiotherapy performed using a linear accelerator or other medical equipment that uses concentrated doses of high-energy X-rays to perform external beam radiation therapy, or nuclear imaging services. Replacement of existing equipment for lithotripsy, stereotactic radiosurgery, stereotactic radiotherapy other than radiotherapy performed using a linear accelerator or other medical equipment that uses concentrated doses of high-energy X-rays to perform external beam radiation therapy, or nuclear imaging services shall not require registration. Such regulations shall include provisions for (i) establishing the agreement of the applicant to provide a level of care in services or funds that matches the average percentage of indigent care provided in the appropriate health planning region and to participate in Medicaid at a reduced rate to indigents, (ii) obtaining accreditation from a nationally recognized accrediting organization approved by the Board for the purpose of quality assurance, and (iii) reporting utilization and other data required by the Board to monitor and evaluate effects on health planning and availability of health care services in the Commonwealth.

History.

1982, c. 388; 1991, c. 561; 1993, c. 704; 1996, c. 1050; 1999, cc. 899, 922, 926; 2003, cc. 61, 72; 2007, c. 502; 2009, c. 175; 2017, c. 791; 2019, cc. 136, 343, 839; 2020, c. 1271; 2022, cc. 712, 772.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2017, c. 791, cl. 2 provides: “That the Commissioner of Health shall report to the Chairmen of the House Committees on Appropriations and Health, Welfare and Institutions and the Senate Committees on Finance and Education and Health by November 1, 2018, a data analysis comparing the value of (i) the total amount of charity care as defined in §

32.1-102.1

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, that each medical care facility provided to indigent persons; (ii) the number of patients to whom charity care was provided; (iii) the specific services delivered to patients that are reported as charity care recipients; and (iv) the portion of the total amount of charity care provided that each service represents to comply with any conditions on such certificates based on the method utilized for valuing such care as of July 1, 2017, to the medical care facility’s cost using a method established by the nonprofit organization defined in §

32.1-276.3

of the Code of Virginia and to the value of such care based on the provider reimbursement methodology utilized by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services for reimbursement under Title XVIII of the Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. § 1395 et seq.”

Acts 2017, c. 791, cl. 3 provides: “That the provisions of this act amending §§

32.1-102.2

and

32.1-102.4

of the Code of Virginia shall become effective on July 1, 2019.”

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendments by cc. 61 and 72 are identical, and added the language beginning “In any structured ...” at the end of subdivision A 1.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 502 added the last sentence in subsection B.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendment by c. 175, effective March 25, 2009, in subdivision A 1, inserted “sterotactic radiotherapy, proton beam therapy” following “radiation therapy” in the first sentence and in clause (i) of the last sentence; and added subdivision A 6 and made related changes.

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendment by c. 791, effective July 1, 2019, in subsection A, substituted “that” for “which” in the introductory paragraph; and rewrote subsection C, which formerly read: “The Board shall also promulgate regulations authorizing the Commissioner to condition approval of a certificate on the agreement of the applicant to provide a level of care at a reduced rate to indigents or accept patients requiring specialized care. In addition, the Board’s licensure regulations shall direct the Commissioner to condition the issuing or renewing of any license for any applicant whose certificate was approved upon such condition on whether such applicant has complied with any agreement to provide a level of care at a reduced rate to indigents or accept patients requiring specialized care.”

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendments by cc. 136 and 343 are nearly identical, added subdivision A 7, and made related changes.

The 2019 amendment by c. 839 added subdivision A 8; and made stylistic changes.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 1271, in subdivision A 1, inserted “other than radiotherapy performed using a linear accelerator or other medical equipment that uses concentrated doses of high-energy X-rays to perform external beam radiation therapy” in the second and last sentences, deleted “or nuclear imaging” following “proton beam therapy” in the second sentence, and deleted “and nuclear medicine imaging” in the last sentence at the end; deleted subdivision A 4, pertaining to a requirement to establish specific criteria for determining need in rural areas, and redesignated the remaining subdivisions accordingly; in present subdivision A 4, deleted “on or after July 1, 1999” following “May establish,” inserted “or registration of a project,” and deleted the former second and third sentences pertaining to amount of fees; in subsection C, inserted the second sentence; added subsection D; updated references; and made stylistic changes.

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendments by cc. 712 and 772 are identical, and rewrote subdivision A 6, which read: “Shall establish an exemption from the requirement for a certificate for a period of not more than 30 days, for projects involving a temporary increase in the total number of beds in an existing hospital or nursing home when the Commissioner has determined that a natural or man-made disaster has caused the evacuation of a hospital or nursing home and that a public health emergency exists due to a shortage of hospital or nursing home beds; and.”

Law Review.

For 2007 annual survey article, “Health Care Law,” see 42 U. Rich. L. Rev. 441 (2007).

§ 32.1-102.2:1.
State Health Services Plan; Task Force.

The Board shall appoint and convene a State Health Services Plan Task Force for the purpose of advising the Board on the content of the State Health Services Plan. The Task Force shall provide recommendations related to (i) periodic revisions to the State Health Services Plan, (ii) specific objective standards of review for each type of medical care facility or project type for which a certificate of public need is required, (iii) project types that are generally noncontested and present limited health planning impacts, (iv) whether certain projects should be subject to expedited review rather than the full review process, and (v) improvements in the certificate of public need process. All such recommendations shall be developed in accordance with an analytical framework established by the Commissioner that includes a specific evaluation of whether State Health Services Plan standards are consistent with the goals of (a) meeting the health care needs of the indigent and uninsured citizens of the Commonwealth, (b) protecting the public health and safety of the citizens of the Commonwealth, (c) promoting the teaching missions of academic medical centers and private teaching hospitals, and (d) ensuring the availability of essential health care services in the Commonwealth, and are aligned with the goals and metrics of the Commonwealth’s State Health Improvement Plan.

The Task Force shall consist of no fewer than 19 individuals appointed by the Commissioner who are broadly representative of the interests of all residents of the Commonwealth and of the various geographic regions, including two representatives of the Virginia Hospital and Healthcare Association, the Medical Society of Virginia, the Virginia Health Care Association, and physicians or administrators representing teaching hospitals affiliated with a public institution of higher education; one representative each of the Virginia Association of Health Plans, the Virginia Association of Free and Charitable Clinics, the Virginia Community Healthcare Association, LeadingAge Virginia, a company that is self-insured or full-insured for health coverage, a nonprofit organization located in the Commonwealth that engages in addressing access to health coverage for low-income individuals, and a rural locality recognized as a medically underserved area; one individual with experience in health facilities planning; and such other individuals as the Commissioner determines is appropriate.

The powers and duties of the Task Force shall be:

To develop, by November 1, 2022, recommendations for a comprehensive State Health Services Plan for adoption by the Board that includes (i) specific formulas for projecting need for medical care facilities and services subject to the requirement to obtain a certificate of public need, (ii) current statistical information on the availability of medical care facilities and services, (iii) objective criteria and standards for review of applications for projects for medical care facilities and services, and (iv) methodologies for integrating the goals and metrics of the State Health Improvement Plan established by the Commissioner into the criteria and standards for review. Criteria and standards for review included in the State Health Services Plan shall take into account current data on drive times, utilization, availability of competing services, and patient choice within and among localities included in the health planning district or region; changes and availability of new technology; and other relevant factors identified by the Task Force. The State Health Services Plan shall also include specific criteria for determining need in rural areas, giving due consideration to distinct and unique geographic, socioeconomic, cultural, transportation, and other barriers to access to care in such areas and providing for weighted calculations of need based on the barriers to health care access in such rural areas in lieu of the determinations of need used for the particular proposed project within the relevant health planning district or region as a whole;

To engage the services of private consultants or request the Department to contract with any private organization for professional and technical assistance and advice or other services to assist the Task Force in carrying out its duties and functions pursuant to this section. The Task Force may also solicit the input of experts with professional competence in the subject matter of the State Health Services Plan, including (i) representatives of licensed health care providers or health care provider organizations owning or operating licensed health facilities and (ii) representatives of organizations concerned with health care consumers and the purchasers and payers of health care services; and

To review annually and, if necessary, develop recommendations for revisions to each section of the State Health Services Plan on a rotating schedule defined by the Task Force at least every two years following the last date of adoption by the Board.

The Task Force shall exercise its powers and carry out its duties to ensure:

The availability and accessibility of quality health services at a reasonable cost and within a reasonable geographic proximity for all people in the Commonwealth, competitive markets, and patient choice;

Appropriate differential consideration of the health care needs of residents in rural localities in ways that do not compromise the quality and affordability of health care services for those residents;

Elimination of barriers to access to care and introduction and availability of new technologies and care delivery models that result in greater integration and coordination of care, reduction in costs, and improvements in quality; and

Compliance with the goals of the State Health Services Plan and improvement in population health.

The Department shall post on its website information regarding the process by which the State Health Services Plan is created and the process by which the Department determines whether a proposed project complies with the State Health Services Plan on its website.

History.

2008, c. 501; 2009, c. 175; 2020, c. 1271.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendment by c. 175, effective March 25, 2009, deleted “Health” following “Department of” in the second sentence.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 1271 rewrote the section, which formerly read: “The Board shall appoint and convene a task force of no fewer than 15 individuals to meet at least once every two years. The task force shall consist of representatives from the Department and the Division of Certificate of Public Need, representatives of regional health planning agencies, representatives of the health care provider community, representatives of the academic medical community, experts in advanced medical technology, and health insurers. The task force shall complete a review of the State Medical Facilities Plan updating or validating existing criteria in the State Medical Facilities Plan at least every four years.”

§ 32.1-102.3.
Demonstration of public need required; criteria for determining need.

No certificate may be issued unless the Commissioner has determined that a public need for the project has been demonstrated. If it is determined that a public need exists for only a portion of a project, a certificate may be issued for that portion and any appeal may be limited to the part of the decision with which the appellant disagrees without affecting the remainder of the decision. Any decision to issue or approve the issuance of a certificate shall be consistent with the most recent applicable provisions of the State Health Services Plan; however, if the Commissioner finds, upon presentation of appropriate evidence, that the provisions of such plan are not relevant to a rural locality’s needs, inaccurate, outdated, inadequate or otherwise inapplicable, the Commissioner, consistent with such finding, may issue or approve the issuance of a certificate and shall initiate procedures to make appropriate amendments to such plan. In cases in which a provision of the State Health Services Plan has been previously set aside by the Commissioner and relevant amendments to the Plan have not yet taken effect, the Commissioner’s decision shall be consistent with the applicable portions of the State Health Services Plan that have not been set aside and the remaining considerations in subsection B.

In determining whether a public need for a project has been demonstrated, the Commissioner shall consider:

The extent to which the proposed project will provide or increase access to health care services for people in the area to be served and the effects that the proposed project will have on access to health care services in areas having distinct and unique geographic, socioeconomic, cultural, transportation, and other barriers to access to health care;

The extent to which the proposed project will meet the needs of people in the area to be served, as demonstrated by each of the following: (i) the level of community support for the proposed project demonstrated by people, businesses, and governmental leaders representing the area to be served; (ii) the availability of reasonable alternatives to the proposed project that would meet the needs of people in the area to be served in a less costly, more efficient, or more effective manner; (iii) any recommendation or report of the regional health planning agency regarding an application for a certificate that is required to be submitted to the Commissioner pursuant to subsection B of §

32.1-102.6

; (iv) any costs and benefits of the proposed project; (v) the financial accessibility of the proposed project to people in the area to be served, including indigent people; and (vi) at the discretion of the Commissioner, any other factors as may be relevant to the determination of public need for a proposed project;

The extent to which the proposed project is consistent with the State Health Services Plan;

The extent to which the proposed project fosters institutional competition that benefits the area to be served while improving access to essential health care services for all people in the area to be served;

The relationship of the proposed project to the existing health care system of the area to be served, including the utilization and efficiency of existing services or facilities;

The feasibility of the proposed project, including the financial benefits of the proposed project to the applicant, the cost of construction, the availability of financial and human resources, and the cost of capital;

The extent to which the proposed project provides improvements or innovations in the financing and delivery of health care services, as demonstrated by (i) the introduction of new technology that promotes quality, cost effectiveness, or both in the delivery of health care services; (ii) the potential for provision of health care services on an outpatient basis; (iii) any cooperative efforts to meet regional health care needs; and (iv) at the discretion of the Commissioner, any other factors as may be appropriate; and

In the case of a project proposed by or affecting a teaching hospital associated with a public institution of higher education or a medical school in the area to be served, (i) the unique research, training, and clinical mission of the teaching hospital or medical school and (ii) any contribution the teaching hospital or medical school may provide in the delivery, innovation, and improvement of health care services for citizens of the Commonwealth, including indigent or underserved populations.

History.

1982, c. 388; 1984, c. 740; 1993, c. 704; 1999, c. 926; 2000, c. 931; 2004, cc. 71, 95; 2008, c. 292; 2009, c. 175; 2020, cc. 227, 558, 1271.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2010, c. 623, cl. 1 provides: “Notwithstanding (i) the provisions of §§

32.1-102.3

and

32.1-102.3:2

of the Code of Virginia, (ii) any regulations of the Board of Health establishing standards for the approval and issuance of Requests for Applications, and (iii) any current Requests for Applications issued pursuant to §

32.1-102.3:2

of the Code of Virginia, the Commissioner of Health shall accept and review applications in any certificate of public need Batch Group G review cycle and may issue certificates of public need for the establishment of a psychiatric service as the result of a relocation of psychiatric beds from one hospital in Planning District 5 to another hospital in Planning District 5. No psychiatric beds relocated from one hospital to another hospital in Planning District 5 to establish a new psychiatric service shall be converted to any use other than inpatient psychiatric care.”

Acts 2011, c. 395, cl. 1 provides: “§ 1. Notwithstanding (i) the provisions of §§

32.1-102.3

and

32.1-102.3:2

of the Code of Virginia, (ii) any regulations of the Board of Health establishing standards for the approval and issuance of Requests for Applications, and (iii) any current Requests for Applications issued pursuant to §

32.1-102.3:2

of the Code of Virginia, the Commissioner of Health shall accept and review applications and may issue certificates of public need for the addition of up to 10 Medicaid-eligible nursing home beds for a certified nursing home licensed for less than 60 beds, which is operated not for profit, is located in Planning District 15 but accepts patients from areas of the Commonwealth outside of the planning district, and provides care for patients regardless of ability to pay.”

Acts 2011, c. 395, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall not become effective unless an appropriation of general funds effectuating the purposes of this act is included in the general appropriation act passed by the 2011 Regular Session of the General Assembly and signed by the Governor and becomes law.” Funding was provided in the 2011 Appropriation Act.

Acts 2018, cc. 1 and 2, cl. 1 provides: “§ 1. That, notwithstanding any other provision of law, any license issued to an acute care hospital located in Patrick County that was valid on September 1, 2017, and remained valid on December 31, 2017, despite the closure of such hospital prior to December 31, 2017, shall continue to remain valid until December 31, 2018.

“§ 2. That, notwithstanding the requirements of §

32.1-102.3

of the Code of Virginia and regulations of the Board of Health, the recommencement of any project by an acute care hospital located in Patrick County that occurs as the result of the closure of an existing licensed hospital for which a certificate was previously issued or for which no certificate was required at the time at which the project was first commenced, and the subsequent sale and reestablishment of such hospital where such recommencement of such project. However, any conditions imposed on any such certificate issued to the existing licensed hospital prior to its closure, sale, or reestablishment shall continue to be in effect until such time as the conditions are satisfied or a new certificate is issued for the hospital.”

Acts 2018, cc. 1 and 2, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall be effective retroactively to December 31, 2017.”

Acts 2018, cc. 1 and 2, cl. 3 provides: “That an emergency exists and this act is in force from its passage [February 16, 2018].”

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendment by c. 931 substituted “planning” for “systems” in subdivisions B 1 and B 2.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendments by cc. 71 and 95 are identical, and added “and the effects on accessibility of any proposed relocation of an existing service or facility” at the end of subdivision B 5.

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendment by c. 292 added subdivision B 21.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendment by c. 175, effective March 25, 2009, added the last sentence in subsection A; and rewrote subsection B.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 227 and 558 are identical, and substituted “people in” for “residents of,” or similar language in subdivision B 1 and throughout subdivision B 2; in clause (i) in subdivision B 2, substituted “people” for “citizens,” and in clause (ii), substituted “people in the area to be served” for “the population”; and in subdivision B 4, substituted “people” for “persons” and made stylistic changes.

The 2020 amendment by c. 1271, substituted “State Health Services Plan” for “State Medical Facilities Plan” throughout in subsection A, deleted the first sentence, which read: “No person shall commence any project without first obtaining a certificate issued by the Commissioner”; in subdivision B 1, substituted “project” for “service or facility” twice, “health care services” for “needed services” twice and “to health care” for “to care”; inserted “proposed” throughout subdivisions B 2 and B 5 through B 7; substituted “proposed project” for “proposed service or facility” in subdivision B 2, clause (ii) and subdivision B 4; in subdivision B 3, substituted “proposed project” for “application”; in subdivision B 7, inserted “care” in the introductory language and “health care” in clause (ii), inserted “services” in subdivision B 8, clause (ii); and made stylistic changes.

Law Review.

For 2007 annual survey article, “Health Care Law,” see 42 U. Rich. L. Rev. 441 (2007).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

9B M.J. Hospitals and Sanitariums, § 3.

§ 32.1-102.3:1.
Application for certificate not required of certain nursing facilities or nursing homes.

An application for a certificate that there exists a public need for a proposed project shall not be required for nursing facilities or nursing homes affiliated with facilities which, on January 1, 1982, and thereafter, meet all of the following criteria:

A facility which is operated as a nonprofit institution.

A facility which is licensed jointly by the Department as a nursing facility or nursing home and by the Department of Social Services as an assisted living facility.

A facility which observes the following restrictions on admissions:

Admissions are only allowed pursuant to the terms of a “life care contract” guaranteeing that the full complement of services offered by the facility is available to the resident as and when needed;

Admissions to the assisted living facility unit are restricted to individuals defined as ambulatory by the Department of Social Services;

Admissions to the nursing facility or nursing home unit are restricted to those individuals who are residents of the assisted living facility unit.

History.

1982, c. 659; 1993, cc. 957, 993; 2008, c. 857; 2009, c. 175; 2011, c. 155.

The number of this section

was assigned by the Virginia Code Commission, the number in the 1982 act having been 32.1-96.1.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1993, cc. 957 and 993, cl. 4 provides “That the provisions of this act shall be implemented to the extent funds are appropriated therefor.” See Acts 1993, c. 994, item 381 B, which relates to the extent funds have been appropriated for Acts 1993, cc. 957 and 993.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendment by c. 175, effective March 25, 2009, deleted “Health” following “Department of” in subdivision 2.

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendment by c. 155 deleted subdivision 4, which read: “A facility in which no resident receives federal or state public assistance funds during an open admissions period. However, a facility in Planning District 8 may apply for certification under the Medical Assistance Program in accordance with §

32.1-102.3:1.1

when an open admissions period has expired or when a facility agrees to voluntarily discontinue its open admissions period”; and deleted the last paragraph, which read: “For the purposes of this section, ‘open admissions period’ means a time during which a facility may take admissions directly into its nursing home beds without the signing of a standard contract.”

§ 32.1-102.3:1.1.
Continuing care retirement communities accessing medical assistance.

A nursing facility in Planning District 8 in a continuing care retirement community registered with the State Corporation Commission pursuant to Chapter 49 (§

38.2-4900

et seq.) of Title 38.2, which is not already certified for participation in the Medical Assistance Program, may be certified for participation in the Medical Assistance Program, without regard to any condition of a certificate of public need, so long as:

The nursing facility is no longer operating under an open admissions period;

Any residents who qualify and receive medical assistance under the state program must have been residents of the continuing care retirement community for at least three years;

Not more than 25 percent of the nursing home beds of the facility, or 15 nursing home beds, whichever is fewer, may be occupied by individuals receiving benefits at any given time; and

Any resident who qualifies for and receives medical assistance under the state program in a continuing care retirement community nursing facility must have first exhausted any refundable entrance fee paid on the resident’s behalf, as defined in §

38.2-4900

, as a result of expenditures for that resident’s care in the continuing care retirement community.

Nothing in this section shall alter the conditions of a continuing care retirement community’s participation in the Medical Assistance Program if that continuing care retirement community was certified for participation prior to July 1, 2010.For the purposes of this section, “open admissions period” means a time during which a facility may take admissions directly into its nursing home beds without the signing of a standard contract.

History.

2008, c. 857; 2011, c. 155; 2019, cc. 299, 384.

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendment by c. 155, in the introductory paragraph in subsection A, inserted “without regard to any condition of a certificate of public need”; deleted “as defined in §

32.1-102.3:1

” from the end of subdivision A 1; deleted subsection B, which read: “Nothing in the conditions of any certificate of public need shall limit the ability of a continuing care retirement community to participate in the Medical Assistance Program”; redesignated former subsection C as subsection B; and added the last paragraph.

The 2019 amendment.

The 2019 amendments by cc. 299 and 384 are nearly identical, and in subsection A, deleted “On or after July 1, 2010” from the beginning; rewrote subdivision A 3, which read: “Not more than 10 percent of the facility may be receiving benefits at any given time; and.”